Nebraska, session 109, LB332.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 38-511, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-511 Nothing in the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act
shall be construed to prevent or restrict:
(1) The practice of audiology or speech-language pathology or the use of
the official title of such practice by a person employed as a speech-language
pathologist or audiologist by the federal government;
(2) A physician from engaging in the practice of medicine and surgery or
any individual from carrying out any properly delegated responsibilities within
the normal practice of medicine and surgery under the supervision of a
physician;
(3) A person licensed as a hearing instrument specialist in this state
from engaging in the fitting, selling, ordering, and servicing of hearing
instruments or performing such other duties as defined in the Hearing
Instrument Specialists Practice Act;
(4) The practice of audiology or speech-language pathology or the use of
the official title of such practice by a person who holds a valid and current
credential as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist issued by the State
Department of Education, if such person performs speech-language pathology or
audiology services solely as a part of his or her duties within an agency,
institution, or organization for which no fee is paid directly or indirectly by
the recipient of such service and under the jurisdiction of the State
Department of Education, but such person may elect to be within the
jurisdiction of the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act;
(5) The clinical practice in audiology or speech-language pathology
required for students enrolled in an accredited college or university pursuing
a major in audiology or speech-language pathology, if such clinical practices
are supervised by a person licensed to practice audiology or speech-language
pathology and if the student is designated by a title such as student clinician
or other title clearly indicating the training status; or
(6) The utilization of a speech aide or other personnel employed by a
public school, educational service unit, or other private or public educational
institution working under the direct supervision of a licensed credentialed
speech-language pathologist.
Sec. 2. Section 38-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-1401 Sections 38-1401 to 38-1428 and sections 4 and 6 to 9 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice
Act.
Sec. 3. Section 38-1402, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-1402 For purposes of the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act
and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1403 to 38-1413 and section 4 of
this act apply.
Sec. 4. Assistant funeral director means a person who assists a funeral
director licensed pursuant to the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act.
Sec. 5. Section 38-1413, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
-1-

LB332 LB332
2025 2025
to read:
38-1413 Supervision means the direct oversight or the easy availability of
the supervising funeral director and embalmer. The first twenty-five funeral
assists and embalmings performed by an apprentice shall be completed under
direct onsite supervision of the supervising funeral director and embalmer.
Sec. 6. To be eligible to enter into a collaborative agreement to act as
an assistant funeral director, an individual shall provide evidence of
successful completion of an approved jurisprudence examination in Nebraska law.
Sec. 7. Prior to acting as an assistant funeral director, the assistant
funeral director shall be employed by a funeral director licensed pursuant to
the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act and shall be a party to a
signed collaborative agreement with the licensed funeral director. An assistant
funeral director may be so employed by more than one funeral director in
Nebraska by being a party to a signed collaborative agreement with each
licensed funeral director.
Sec. 8. (1) An assistant funeral director may assist a funeral director
licensed pursuant to the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act with one
or more of the principal functions of funeral directing, including the
operation and management of a licensed funeral establishment. Such principal
functions shall include, but not be limited to, conducting funeral services,
arranging interments, working with families on funeral arrangements, and
performing daily management and all permitted necessary funeral activities
related to the operation of a licensed funeral establishment. The assistant
funeral director shall perform all work under the supervision and control of
the licensed funeral director.
(2) An assistant funeral director shall not engage in any aspect of the
practice of embalming a dead human body. An assistant funeral director found to
be in violation of this subsection shall have any collaborative agreement in
Nebraska immediately terminated and employment in Nebraska as an assistant
funeral director immediately terminated.
Sec. 9. A funeral director who is employing an assistant funeral director
shall enter into a collaborative agreement with the assistant funeral director,
supervise the assistant funeral director, and keep records of the collaborative
agreement and the functions of the assistant funeral director.
Sec. 10. Section 38-1424, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-1424 (1) In addition to the grounds for disciplinary action found in
sections 38-178 and 38-179, a credential issued under the Funeral Directing and
Embalming Practice Act may be denied, refused renewal, limited, revoked, or
suspended or have other disciplinary measures taken against it in accordance
with section 38-196 when the applicant or credential holder is found guilty of
any of the following acts or offenses:
(a) Solicitation of dead human bodies by the credential holder or his or
her agents, assistants, or employees, either prior to or following death;
(b) The purchasing of funeral or embalming engagements or the payment of a
commission either directly or indirectly or offer of payment of such commission
to any agent, assistant, or employee for the purpose of securing business;
(c) Using indecent, profane, or obscene language in the presence of a dead
human body or within the immediate presence or hearing of the family,
relatives, or friends of the deceased prior to the burial of the deceased;
(d) Soliciting or accepting any remuneration, commission, bonus, or rebate
in consideration of the recommending or causing a dead human body to be placed
in any crematory, mausoleum, or cemetery;
(e) Using any casket or part thereof which has previously been used as a
receptacle for, or in connection with, the shipment, burial, or other
disposition of a dead human body without first identifying such item as used;
(f) Violations of any state law, municipal ordinance, or rule or
regulation of the department or other body having regulatory powers, relating
to the handling, custody, care, or transportation of dead human bodies;
(g) Refusal to surrender promptly the custody of a dead human body upon
request of a person or persons lawfully entitled to the custody thereof; or
(h) Taking undue advantage of a patron or patrons, or being found guilty
of fraud, or misrepresentation in the selling of merchandise or service to
patrons; or .
(i) Failure to comply with section 9 of this act.
(2) An applicant or a credential holder shall be subject to the penalty
provisions of this section if found guilty of any of the following:
(a) Paying, directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of value as a
commission or gratuity for the securing of business;
(b) The buying of a business of any person, firm, or corporation, or the
paying of a commission to any person, firm, or corporation or to any hospital
or any institution where death occurs or to any hospital superintendent, nurse,
intern, or other employee, whether directly or indirectly; or
(c) Willful malpractice.
(3) Any funeral director and embalmer who commits any of the acts or
things prohibited by this section or otherwise violates any of the provisions
thereof shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a licensed
funeral director and embalmer from engaging in sales of funeral goods or
services under the Burial Pre-Need Sale Act.
Sec. 11. Section 38-1501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-1501 Sections 38-1501 to 38-1518 and sections 14 and 23 to 32 of this
-2-

LB332 LB332
2025 2025
act shall be known and may be cited as the Hearing Instrument Specialists
Practice Act.
Sec. 12. Section 38-1502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-1502 For purposes of the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act
and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1503 to 38-1507 and section 14
of this act apply.
Sec. 13. Section 38-1504, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-1504 Hearing instrument means any wearable instrument or device
designed for, or offered for the purpose of, or represented as aiding persons
with or compensating for impaired human hearing and any parts, attachments, or
accessories, including earmold, but excluding batteries and cords. Hearing
instrument does not include a wearable instrument or device with an implantable
component such as a wearable processor for a cochlear implant or bone-anchored
implant.
Sec. 14. Hearing instrument specialist means a person who engages in the
practice of ordering the use and fitting of hearing instruments.
Sec. 15. Section 38-1505, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-1505 (1) Practice of ordering the use and fitting of hearing
instruments includes the following activities:
(a) Eliciting patient case histories, including medical history,
otological history, pharmacological history, amplification history, and patient
attitudes and expectations;
(b) Administering otoscopy and, if required, cerumen removal for the
purpose of identifying possible otological conditions, including, but not
limited to, any of the conditions related to warnings found in the regulations
of the federal Food and Drug Administration, 21 C.F.R. 801.422, as such
regulations existed on January 1, 2025, which may indicate the need for a
medical referral or which may have a bearing on outcomes or recommendations;
(c) Administering and interpreting tests of human hearing performed with
an audiometer, including other appropriate objective and subjective methodology
and measures, for purposes of ordering and fitting hearing aids;
(d) Determining candidacy for hearing instruments, and discussing the
results of a human hearing test with the individual to inform the individual
about potential options for addressing the individual's hearing loss, including
hearing instruments, hearing-assistive devices, or other medical interventions,
and facilitating appropriate referrals, if needed;
(e) Ordering, selecting, or fitting appropriate hearing instruments and
assistive devices, including appropriate technology, programming parameters,
and special custom earpiece applications, as indicated;
(f) Assessing hearing instrument efficacy utilizing appropriate fitting
verification methodology and equipment, which may include real-ear measures or
speech mapping, and electroacoustic analysis equipment;
(g) Assessing hearing instrument benefits through appropriate validation
measures, which may include communication assessment questionnaires or speech
audiometry;
(h)(i) Taking ear impressions or electronic scans by any method used for
the purpose of creating earmolds and (ii) preparing earmolds for hearing
instruments, assistive devices, telecommunications applications, ear
protection, and other related applications;
(i) Ordering and modifying earmolds and auditory equipment, excluding FM
transmitters, to meet a patient's needs;
(j) Providing services in the use and care of hearing instruments and
assistive devices, including listening strategies and other approaches to
foster optimal patient results;
(k) Providing supervision and inservice training of those entering the
dispensing profession;
(l) Providing post-fitting care and services and hearing instrument care
and repair services; or
(m) Any other act of hearing assessment pertaining to hearing testing,
ordering the use of hearing instruments, or the selling, renting, leasing, and
delivery of hearing instruments.
(2) Practice of ordering the use and fitting of hearing instruments does
not include:
(a) Evaluation, diagnosis, management, or treatment of auditory or
vestibular conditions;
(b) Provision of tinnitus evaluation, treatment, or management;
(c) Interpretation of tests of human hearing for any purpose beyond the
selection and fitting of hearing aids;
(d) Removal of foreign bodies from the ear; and
(e) Testing and treatment of auditory processing disorders, including the
provision of aural rehabilitation or auditory training.
Practice of fitting hearing instruments means the measurement of human
hearing by means of an audiometer or by other means approved by the board
solely for the purpose of making selections, adaptations, or sale of hearing
instruments. The term also includes the making of impressions for earmolds. A
dispenser, at the request of a physician or a member of related professions,
may make audiograms for the professional's use in consultation with the hard-
of-hearing.
Sec. 16. Section 38-1508, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
-3-

LB332 LB332
2025 2025
to read:
38-1508 The board shall consist of five professional members and one
public member appointed pursuant to section 38-158. Members The members shall
meet the requirements of sections 38-164 and 38-165. The professional members
shall consist of three licensed hearing instrument specialists, one
otolaryngologist, and one audiologist until one licensed hearing instrument
specialist vacates his or her office or his or her term expires, whichever
occurs first, at which time the professional members of the board shall consist
of three licensed hearing instrument specialists, at least one of whom does not
hold a license as an audiologist, one otolaryngologist, and one audiologist. At
the expiration of the four-year terms of the members serving on December 1,
2008, successors shall be appointed for five-year terms.
Sec. 17. Section 38-1509, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-1509 (1)(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, it shall
be unlawful for any person to engage in the practice of ordering the use and
fitting of no person shall engage in the sale of or practice of fitting hearing
instruments or display a sign or in any other way advertise or represent that
the person is engaged in the practice of ordering the use and fitting himself
or herself as a person who practices the fitting and sale or dispensing of
hearing instruments unless such person he or she holds a current, an
unsuspended, and unrevoked hearing instrument specialist license issued by the
department as provided in the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act.
(b) A hearing instrument specialist license shall confer upon the holder
the right to select, fit, and sell hearing instruments. A person holding a
license issued under the act prior to August 30, 2009, may continue to practice
under such license until it expires under the terms of the license.
(2) A licensed audiologist who maintains a practice pursuant to (a)
licensure as an audiologist, or (b) a privilege to practice audiology under the
Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact, in which hearing
instruments are regularly dispensed, or who intends to maintain such a
practice, shall be exempt from the requirement to be licensed as a hearing
instrument specialist.
(3) A hearing instrument specialist or audiologist may order the use of
devices pursuant to 21 C.F.R. 801.109, as such regulation existed on January 1,
2025.
(4)(a) (3) Nothing in the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act act
shall prohibit a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust,
association, or other like organization maintaining an established business
address from engaging in the business of selling or offering for sale hearing
instruments at retail without a license if it employs only properly licensed
natural persons in the direct sale and fitting of such products.
(b) Each such organization shall file annually with the department, on a
form provided by the department, a list of the licensed hearing instrument
specialists employed by the organization. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to carry out this section.
(4) Nothing in the act shall prohibit the holder of a hearing instrument
specialist license from the fitting and sale of wearable instruments or devices
designed for or offered for the purpose of conservation or protection of
hearing.
Sec. 18. Section 38-1510, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-1510 (1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall only provide
services to an individual who is eighteen years of age or older unless
prohibited by federal law.
(2) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act does not change the
scope of practice of a licensed audiologist.
(3) (1) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act is not intended to
prevent any person from engaging in the practice of measuring human hearing for
the purpose of selection of hearing instruments if such person or organization
employing such person does not sell hearing instruments or the accessories
thereto.
(4) (2) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act does act shall not
apply to a person who is a physician or audiologist licensed to practice in
this state, except that such physician or audiologist shall not delegate the
authority to fit and dispense hearing instruments unless the person to whom the
authority is delegated is licensed as a hearing instrument specialist under the
act.
Sec. 19. Section 38-1511, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-1511 (1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall enter into a
written contract for each sale of a hearing instrument which states the terms
of the sale.
(2)(a) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall, at the time of
delivery of the hearing instrument, provide the patient with a receipt
containing (i) the signature, regular business address, and license number of
the licensee, (ii) the brand, model, manufacturer or manufacturer
identification code, and serial number of the hearing instrument, and (iii) the
amount charged for the hearing instrument.
(b) The receipt shall indicate that the hearing device is classified as
programmed with one of the following:
(i) Locked software - this device utilizes locked software that is
available to limited providers. The purchase of this device will require the
-4-

LB332 LB332
2025 2025
user to have the device programmed by a provider or chain store that has been
granted proprietary access to the software. In addition, the availability of
any part or service for this device is limited to the provider or chain store
that has such proprietary access; or
(ii) Unlocked software - this device utilizes unlocked software that is
readily available to any provider or location licensed to provide hearing
health care.
(c) The receipt shall also specify (i) whether the hearing instrument is
new, used, or rebuilt, as provided in 21 C.F.R. 801.422, as such regulation
existed on January 1, 2025, (ii) the length of time and other terms of the
guarantee, and (iii) by whom the hearing instrument is guaranteed.
(3) No hearing instrument may be sold to any person unless both the
packaging containing the hearing instrument and the itemized receipt are in
compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations.
(4) Upon delivery of the hearing instrument to any person, the licensed
hearing instrument specialist shall confirm the physical and operational
performance of the hearing instrument. If a patient purchases a hearing
instrument from a licensed hearing instrument specialist outside of the
licensee's regular place of business and the regular place of business is not
within a reasonable distance, as determined by the board, the licensed hearing
instrument specialist shall provide the patient with the address of an
affiliate location with which the licensee is associated that is within a
reasonable distance, at which a licensed hearing instrument specialist or
audiologist is available for fitting services.
(5) Any seller offering for sale or selling a hearing instrument in this
state or to a resident of this state shall make available in this state an in-
person fitting of the hearing instrument by a licensed hearing instrument
specialist in this state prior to the sale.
(1) Any person who practices the fitting and sale of hearing instruments
shall deliver to each person supplied with a hearing instrument a receipt which
shall contain the licensee's signature and show his or her business address and
the number of his or her certificate, together with specifications as to the
make and model of the hearing instrument furnished, and clearly stating the
full terms of sale. If a hearing instrument which is not new is sold, the
receipt and the container thereof shall be clearly marked as used or
reconditioned, whichever is applicable, with terms of guarantee, if any.
(6) A receipt provided pursuant to this section (2) Such receipt shall
bear in no smaller type than the largest used in the body copy portion the
following: The purchaser has been advised at the outset of the his or her
relationship with the hearing instrument specialist that any examination or
representation made by a licensed hearing instrument specialist in connection
with the fitting and selling of this hearing instrument is not an examination,
diagnosis, or prescription by a person licensed to practice medicine in this
state and therefor must not be regarded as medical opinion or advice.
Sec. 20. Section 38-1512, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-1512 (1) Any person may obtain a hearing instrument specialist license
under the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act by successfully passing a
qualifying examination pursuant to section 38-1514 if the applicant provides
verification to the department, on a form provided by the department, that such
person:
(a) Is at least twenty-one years of age; and
(b) Has an education equivalent to a four-year course in an accredited
high school; and .
(c)(i) Has completed the minimum number of practicum hours prescribed by
the board;
(ii) Has a two-year degree in hearing instrument sciences or an equivalent
as determined by the board;
(iii) Has held a current, unsuspended, and unrevoked license to dispense
hearing instruments from another jurisdiction for at least twelve of the last
eighteen months prior to taking the examination;
(iv) Is certified by the National Board for Certification in Hearing
Instrument Sciences at the time of taking the examination; or
(v) Holds an advanced credential offered by the International Hearing
Society at the time of taking the examination.
(2) The department, with the recommendation of the board, may determine
whether a person who has completed a licensure program outside of the United
States may take the examination.
(3) The department, upon recommendation of the board, may waive components
of the examination pursuant to section 38-1514 for licensure as a hearing
instrument specialist if the person has passed the same examination as provided
in section 38-1514 or a substantially equivalent examination as determined by
the board.
(4) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall determine
whether a person has met the requirements to be eligible to take the
examination pursuant to the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act.
(2) The qualifying examination shall consist of written and practical
tests. The examination shall not be conducted in such a manner that college
training is required in order to pass. Nothing in this examination shall imply
that the applicant is required to possess the degree of medical competence
normally expected of physicians.
(3) The department shall give examinations approved by the board. A
minimum of two examinations shall be offered each calendar year.
-5-

LB332 LB332
2025 2025
Sec. 21. Section 38-1513, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-1513 (1) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall
issue a temporary training license to any person who has met the requirements
for licensure as a hearing instrument specialist pursuant to subdivisions (1)
(a) and (b) subsection (1) of section 38-1512. Previous experience or a waiting
period shall not be required to obtain a temporary training license.
(2) Any person who desires a temporary training license shall make
application to the department. The temporary training license shall be issued
for a period of one year. A person holding a valid license as a hearing
instrument specialist or an audiologist shall be responsible for the
supervision and training of such applicant and shall maintain adequate personal
contact with him or her.
(3) If a person who holds a temporary training license under this section
has not successfully passed the licensing examination within twelve months of
the date of issuance of the temporary training license, the temporary training
license may be renewed or reissued for a twelve-month period. In no case may a
temporary training license be renewed or reissued more than once. A renewal or
reissuance may take place any time after the expiration of the first twelve-
month period.
Sec. 22. Section 38-1514, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-1514 (1) The examination required by section 38-1512 for licensure as a
hearing instrument specialist shall be comprised of:
(a) A written or computer-based, psychometrically valid, competency
examination approved by the board that tests the examinee for knowledge
fundamental to the practice of ordering the use and fitting of hearing
instruments;
(b) A practical examination approved by the board that requires the
examinee to demonstrate competence in the practice of ordering the use and
fitting of hearing instruments; and
(c) A jurisprudence examination approved by the board.
(2)(a) If an examinee fails more than one portion of the practical
examination, the examinee shall retake the entire practical examination upon
payment of the examination fee.
(b) If an examinee fails only one portion of the practical examination,
the examinee may retake that portion of the examination without payment of a
fee.
(c) If an examinee fails the jurisprudence examination or competency
examination, the examinee shall retake the entire examination upon payment of
the examination fee.
(d) If an examinee fails either the practical or competency component of
the examination and fails two subsequent reexaminations, the examinee shall be
disqualified from retaking the examination a fourth time until the examinee
meets with the board, presents an acceptable written training plan to the board
for passing the components of the examination, and successfully completes that
plan.
(3) The qualifying examination provided in section 38-1512 shall be
designed to demonstrate the applicant's adequate technical qualifications by:
(a) (1) Tests of knowledge in the following areas as they pertain to the
practice of ordering the use and fitting and sale of hearing instruments:
(i) (a) Basic physics of sound;
(ii) (b) The anatomy and physiology of the ear; and
(iii) (c) The function of hearing instruments; and
(b) (2) Practical tests of proficiency in the following techniques as they
pertain to the fitting of hearing instruments:
(i) (a) Pure tone audiometry, including air conduction testing and bone
conduction testing;
(ii) (b) Live voice or recorded voice speech audiometry;
(iii) (c) Masking when indicated;
(iv) (d) Recording and evaluation of audiograms and speech audiometry to
determine proper selection and adaptation of a hearing instrument; and
(v) (e) Taking earmold impressions.
Sec. 23. (1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall not engage in
the practice of ordering the use and fitting of hearing instruments with
respect to a patient without having conducted a face-to-face hearing assessment
for the patient or having conducted or reviewed a valid and current hearing
assessment for the patient that is dated within six months and signed by a
licensed hearing instrument specialist or audiologist. Such hearing assessment
shall include the following procedures, or modified procedures as required by
the patient's cognitive function or health and appropriate to technological
developments as determined by the board:
(a) Completion of a patient history questionnaire;
(b) Otoscopic examination;
(c) Testing to determine the type and degree of hearing loss that includes
(i) pure-tone air conduction testing at two hundred fifty hertz, five hundred
hertz, one thousand hertz, two thousand hertz, four thousand hertz, and eight
thousand hertz, (ii) bone conduction testing at five hundred hertz, one
thousand hertz, two thousand hertz, and four thousand hertz, and (iii)
appropriate inter-octave testing when needed if the octave to adjacent octave
threshold difference is greater than fifteen decibels;
(d) Effective masking when indicated;
(e) Appropriate testing to determine speech reception thresholds, word
-6-

LB332 LB332
2025 2025
recognition scores, most comfortable listening levels, uncomfortable loudness
levels, frequency-specific loudness discomfort levels, ability to understand
speech in noise, and the selection of the best fitting arrangement for maximum
hearing instrument benefit when indicated; and
(f) Other speech tests commonly used to assess human hearing acuity for
ordering the use and fitting of hearing instruments.
(2) Each component of a hearing instrument shall be adapted to the needs
of the patient. A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall conduct a final
fitting to ensure physical fit and operational comfort of the hearing
instrument.
Sec. 24. A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall demonstrate the
benefit of a hearing instrument fitting by using objective measures.
Sec. 25. A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall determine a
patient's benefit with the hearing instrument fitting using validation
measures, such as speech audiometry and validated communication assessment
questionnaires, or any other method approved by the board for ordering the use
and fitting of hearing instruments.
Sec. 26. (1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall use the
following equipment as part of any hearing testing conducted for the purpose of
dispensing of hearing instruments:
(a) An audiometer that has been calibrated within the twelve months
preceding the test and that meets the specifications set forth under this
section; and
(b) A speech audiometer that has been calibrated within the twelve months
preceding the test and that meets the specifications set forth under this
section.
(2) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall provide for the
calibration of the equipment utilized for hearing assessments required under
section 23 of this act and in the dispensing of hearing instruments at least
annually in conformance with current standards of the American National
Standards Institute for ordering the use and fitting of hearing instruments. A
licensed hearing instrument specialist shall annually ensure that audiometric
equipment has been evaluated electrically and acoustically, that the equipment
has been adjusted or repaired if necessary, and that conformity with such
standards was determined at that time. A licensed hearing instrument specialist
shall maintain calibration records for ten years and shall make the records
available for inspection by the department at any time. A licensed hearing
instrument specialist shall also use routine procedures for the daily
inspection of audiometric equipment, or prior to use if used less often than
daily, to generally determine that the equipment is in normal working order.
(3) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall provide the following
care of the equipment used in the licensee's practice of ordering the use and
fitting of hearing instruments:
(a) Hearing instruments, assistive-listening devices, and electronic
equipment shall be maintained according to the manufacturer's specifications;
(b) Instrumental technology shall be maintained in proper working order
and be properly calibrated according to accepted standards; and
(c) Proper infection control and sanitation procedures shall be utilized.
Sec. 27. (1) Prior to engaging in cerumen removal, a licensed hearing
instrument specialist shall have held a valid, undisciplined license as a
licensed hearing instrument specialist for a minimum of two consecutive years
and provide the board with evidence of (a) successful completion of a cerumen
removal course pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and (b) professional
liability insurance pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. If the licensed
hearing instrument specialist continues to engage in cerumen removal, the
licensee shall annually provide evidence to the board of professional liability
insurance.
(2) If the patient exhibits contraindications to cerumen removal requiring
medical consultation or medical intervention, a licensed hearing instrument
specialist shall refer the patient to an otolaryngologist or another physician
licensed to practice medicine and surgery under the Uniform Credentialing Act.
If a licensed hearing instrument specialist engaged in routine cerumen removal
discovers any trauma, including, but not limited to, continuous uncontrolled
bleeding, lacerations, or other traumatic injuries, the licensee shall, as soon
as practicable, seek immediate medical attention for the patient.
(3)(a) Prior to engaging in cerumen removal, a licensed hearing instrument
specialist shall complete a cerumen removal course recommended by a national
medical or audiology organization and approved by the board and provide the
board with evidence of such successful completion and attestation of
competence. In order to be approved by the board as a cerumen removal course,
the course shall be approved by a national medical or audiology organization
and shall:
(i) Be overseen by a physician or an audiologist, preferably an
otolaryngologist;
(ii) Consist of at least six hours of practice of cerumen removal from an
ear canal model using a variety of safe techniques;
(iii) Include in-person practice of cerumen removal techniques;
(iv) Include an infectious control component; and
(v) Result in a certificate of successful completion and attestation of
competence signed by such physician or audiologist.
(b) The board may, only after consultation with the Board of Medicine and
Surgery and the Board of Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology, adopt rules
and regulations as provided in section 38-126 to provide requirements for the
-7-

LB332 LB332
2025 2025
initial cerumen removal course.
(4) The licensed hearing instrument specialist shall maintain
documentation evidencing the satisfactory completion of the training.
(5) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall carry appropriate
professional liability insurance before engaging in cerumen removal.
(6) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall perform cerumen removal
using the customary removal techniques that are commensurate with the
licensee's training and experience. Performance of cerumen removal is limited
to the patient's cartilaginous outer one-third portion of the external auditory
canal.
(7) A licensed hearing instrument specialist engaged in cerumen removal
shall comply with the following requirements:
(a) The indications for cerumen removal for a licensed hearing instrument
specialist shall include:
(i) Enabling audiometric testing;
(ii) Making ear impressions;
(iii) Fitting ear protection or prosthetic devices; and
(iv) Monitoring continuous use of hearing aids;
(b) The licensed hearing instrument specialist shall refer a patient to an
otolaryngologist or another physician licensed under the Uniform Credentialing
Act for medical consultation or medical intervention if the patient exhibits
any of the following contraindications to cerumen removal:
(i) The patient is younger than eighteen years of age;
(ii) The patient has a perforated tympanic membrane;
(iii) The patient has a history of pain or active drainage or bleeding
from the ear;
(iv) There is evidence of congenital or traumatic deformity of the ear;
(v) The patient has had previous ear surgery;
(vi) The patient has tympanostomy tubes, such that irrigation should not
be used;
(vii) The patient has a bleeding disorder;
(viii) The patient has an actual or suspected foreign body in the ear;
(ix) The patient has a stenosis or bony exostosis of the ear canal;
(x) The patient has a tympanic membrane that the licensed hearing
instrument specialist is unable to see; or
(xi) There is any other contraindication to cerumen removal that requires
medical consultation or medical intervention; and
(c) If the patient, while undergoing cerumen removal that did not present
contraindications, complains of significant pain, exhibits uncontrolled
bleeding or a laceration of the external auditory canal, or experiences the
acute onset of dizziness or vertigo or sudden hearing loss, the licensed
hearing instrument specialist shall immediately stop the procedure and refer
the patient to an otolaryngologist or another physician licensed under the
Uniform Credentialing Act.
(8) The licensed hearing instrument specialist shall maintain the
following proper infection control practices:
(a) Universal health precautions;
(b) Decontamination;
(c) Cleaning, disinfection, and sterilization of multiple-use equipment;
and
(d) Universal precautions for prevention of the transmission of human
immunodeficiency virus, hepatitis B virus, and other bloodborne pathogens, as
defined by occupational safety and health standards promulgated pursuant to 29
C.F.R. 1910, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2025.
(9) The licensed hearing instrument specialist who performs cerumen
removal shall maintain a case history for every patient and informed consent
signed by the patient as part of the patient's records. A licensed hearing
instrument specialist shall include in the patient's record video-otoscopy
pictures of the patient's ear canal showing cerumen that must be removed and
video-otoscopy pictures after the removal of the cerumen.
(10) The licensed hearing instrument specialist shall carry appropriate
professional liability insurance before performing cerumen removal.
(11) The licensed hearing instrument specialist is prohibited from
requiring patients to sign any form that eliminates liability if the patient is
harmed.
(12) A licensed hearing instrument specialist who passes the initial
training in cerumen removal shall take one additional hour of continuing
education specific to cerumen removal annually, by any approved means, in
addition to the required continuing education requirements for the license as a
licensed hearing instrument specialist.
Sec. 28. A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall advise a
prospective hearing instrument user to consult promptly with an
otolaryngologist, or a licensed physician if no otolaryngologist is available,
before dispensing a hearing instrument if the licensee determines, through
inquiry, actual observation, or review of any other available information
concerning the prospective user, that the prospective user has any of the
conditions related to warnings found in the regulations of the federal Food and
Drug Administration, 21 C.F.R. 801.422, as such regulations existed on January
1, 2025.
Sec. 29. It is a condition of licensure under the Hearing Instrument
Specialists Practice Act that a licensed hearing instrument specialist comply
with the rules of the federal Food and Drug Administration governing the
ordering of the use, fitting, and sales of hearing instruments as prescribed by
-8-

LB332 LB332
2025 2025
21 C.F.R. 801.422, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2025.
Sec. 30. A purchaser of a hearing instrument shall not be required to
obtain a medical evaluation for the repurchase of a hearing instrument after a
medical evaluation has been obtained for certain otologic conditions that are
permanent and would be reidentified at each hearing assessment. Such conditions
shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Visible congenital or traumatic deformity of the ear;
(2) Unilateral or asymmetric hearing loss, assuming no change in
thresholds; and
(3) Audiometric air-bone gap equal to or greater than fifteen decibels at
five hundred hertz, one thousand hertz, and two thousand hertz.
Sec. 31. (1) A licensed hearing instrument specialist shall keep and
maintain in the licensee's office or place of business the following records:
(a) Results of tests and other records as they pertain to hearing
assessments conducted by the licensed hearing instrument specialist and the
dispensing of hearing instruments by the licensed hearing instrument
specialist;
(b) A copy of the written contract and, if executed, signed medical
evaluation waiver; and
(c) Copies of such other records as the department, with the
recommendation of the board, reasonably requires.
(2) Any such record shall be kept and maintained by the licensed hearing
instrument specialist for a period of seven years after the date the record was
produced.
Sec. 32. A licensed hearing instrument specialist who is certified by the
National Board for Certification in Hearing Instrument Sciences or has an
advanced credential recognized by the board may work for a company or
organization as a trainer and provide specialized training in the practical
application of hearing instrument sciences.
Sec. 33. Section 38-2849, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2849 The board shall be composed of eight five members, including five
four actively practicing pharmacists, at least one of whom practices within the
confines of a hospital, one pharmacy technician, and two one public members
member who are is interested in the health of the people of Nebraska.
Sec. 34. Section 38-2884, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2884 Under a delegated dispensing permit for a public health clinic,
approved formulary drugs and devices may be dispensed by a public health clinic
worker or a health care professional licensed in Nebraska to practice medicine
and surgery or licensed in Nebraska as a registered nurse, licensed practical
nurse, or physician assistant without the onsite services of a pharmacist if:
(1) The initial dispensing of all prescriptions for approved formulary
drugs and devices is conducted by a health care professional licensed in
Nebraska to practice medicine and surgery or pharmacy or licensed in Nebraska
as a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or physician assistant;
(2) The drug or device is dispensed pursuant to a prescription written
onsite by a practitioner or by a practitioner licensed in Nebraska working in
affiliation with a public health clinic pursuant to a delegated dispensing
permit;
(3) The only prescriptions to be refilled under the delegated dispensing
permit are prescriptions for contraceptives;
(4) Prescriptions are accompanied by patient instructions and written
information approved by the director;
(5) The dispensing of authorized refills of contraceptives is done by a
licensed health care professional listed in subdivision (1) of this section or
by a public health clinic worker;
(6) All drugs or devices are prepackaged by the manufacturer or at a
public health clinic by a pharmacist into the quantity to be prescribed and
dispensed at the public health clinic;
(7) All drugs and devices stored, received, or dispensed under the
authority of public health clinics are properly labeled at all times. For
purposes of this subdivision, properly labeled means that the label affixed to
the container prior to dispensing contains the following information:
(a) The name of the manufacturer;
(b) The lot number and expiration date from the manufacturer or, if
repackaged by a pharmacist, the lot number and calculated expiration date;
(c) Directions for patient use;
(d) The quantity of drug in the container;
(e) The name, strength, and dosage form of the drug; and
(f) Auxiliary labels as needed for proper adherence to any prescription;
(8) The following additional information is added to the label of each
container when the drug or device is dispensed:
(a) The patient's name;
(b) The name of the prescribing health care professional;
(c) The prescription number;
(d) The date dispensed; and
(e) The name and address of the public health clinic;
(9) The only drugs and devices allowed to be dispensed or stored by public
health clinics appear on the formulary approved pursuant to section 38-2881;
and
(10) At any time that dispensing is occurring from a public health clinic,
the delegating pharmacist for the public health clinic or on-call pharmacist in
-9-

LB332 LB332
2025 2025
Nebraska is available, either in person or by telephone, to answer questions
from clients, staff, public health clinic workers, or volunteers. This
availability shall be confirmed and documented at the beginning of each day
that dispensing will occur. The delegating pharmacist or on-call pharmacist
shall inform the public health clinic if he or she will not be available during
the time that his or her availability is required. If a pharmacist is
unavailable, no dispensing shall occur.
Sec. 35. Section 38-28,104, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
38-28,104 (1) A prescription for a legend drug which is not a controlled
substance must contain the following information prior to being filled by a
pharmacist or a practitioner who holds a pharmacy license under subdivision (1)
of section 38-2850: Patient's name, or if not issued for a specific patient,
the words "for emergency use" or "for use in immunizations"; name of the drug,
device, or biological; strength of the drug or biological, if applicable;
dosage form of the drug or biological; quantity of drug, device, or biological
prescribed; number of authorized refills; directions for use; date of issuance;
prescribing practitioner's name; and if the prescription is written,
prescribing practitioner's signature. Prescriptions for controlled substances
must meet the requirements of sections 28-414 and 28-414.01.
(2) If a pharmacist receives a request for a prescription refill with no
refill authorization and the pharmacist is unable to obtain a refill
authorization from the prescribing practitioner after making reasonable
efforts, the pharmacist may dispense an emergency refill if:
(a) The pharmacist obtains prescription information from: (i) A
prescription label; (ii) a prescription record located in any pharmacy; or
(iii) a common database;
(b) The prescription refill is not for a controlled substance;
(c) The prescription refill is for a maintenance medication;
(d) In the pharmacist's professional judgment, failure to dispense the
refill is likely to endanger the patient's health or disrupt essential drug
therapy for the patient;
(e) The pharmacist informs the patient or the patient's agent at the time
of dispensing that the refill is being provided without the prescriber's
authorization and that prescriber authorization is required for future refills;
(f) The prescription refill is documented in the patient's prescription
record;
(g) The pharmacist informs the prescriber within seventy-two hours of
dispensing the refill; and
(h) The prescription refill is dispensed in person or delivered by staff
of the pharmacy.
(3) A refill provided pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall not
be (a) dispensed in an amount greater than a seven-day supply, except that if
the drug is packaged in a form that requires a pharmacist to dispense the drug
in an amount greater than a seven-day supply, the pharmacist may dispense the
drug in the smallest quantity in which the drug is typically packaged and (b)
dispensed to the same patient more than one time in any six-month period.
(4) The prescriber of a drug shall not be liable or subject to
disciplinary action for an act or omission in connection with dispensing a
refill pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
Sec. 36. Section 68-911, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
68-911 (1) Medical assistance shall include coverage for health care and
related services as required under Title XIX of the federal Social Security
Act, including, but not limited to:
(a) Inpatient and outpatient hospital services;
(b) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(c) Nursing facility services;
(d) Home health services;
(e) Nursing services;
(f) Clinic services;
(g) Physician services;
(h) Medical and surgical services of a dentist;
(i) Nurse practitioner services;
(j) Nurse midwife services;
(k) Pregnancy-related services;
(l) Medical supplies;
(m) Mental health and substance abuse services;
(n) Early and periodic screening and diagnosis and treatment services for
children which shall include both physical and behavioral health screening,
diagnosis, and treatment services;
(o) Rural health clinic services; and
(p) Federally qualified health center services.
(2) In addition to coverage otherwise required under this section, medical
assistance may include coverage for health care and related services as
permitted but not required under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act,
including, but not limited to:
(a) Prescribed drugs;
(b) Intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental
disabilities;
(c) Home and community-based services for aged persons and persons with
disabilities;
(d) Dental services;
-10-

LB332 LB332
2025 2025
(e) Rehabilitation services;
(f) Personal care services;
(g) Durable medical equipment;
(h) Medical transportation services;
(i) Vision-related services;
(j) Speech therapy services;
(k) Physical therapy services;
(l) Chiropractic services;
(m) Occupational therapy services;
(n) Optometric services;
(o) Podiatric services;
(p) Hospice services;
(q) Mental health and substance abuse services;
(r) Hearing screening services for newborn and infant children; and
(s) Administrative expenses related to administrative activities,
including outreach services, provided by school districts and educational
service units to students who are eligible or potentially eligible for medical
assistance.
(3) No later than July 1, 2009, the department shall submit a state plan
amendment or waiver to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
to provide coverage under the medical assistance program for community-based
secure residential and subacute behavioral health services for all eligible
recipients, without regard to whether the recipient has been ordered by a
mental health board under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act to receive
such services.
(4) On or before October 1, 2014, the department, after consultation with
the State Department of Education, shall submit a state plan amendment to the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, as necessary, to provide
that the following are direct reimbursable services when provided by school
districts as part of an individualized education program or an individualized
family service plan: Early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment
services for children; medical transportation services; mental health services;
nursing services; occupational therapy services; personal care services;
physical therapy services; rehabilitation services; speech therapy and other
services for individuals with speech, hearing, or language disorders; and
vision-related services.
(5)(a) No later than January 1, 2023, the department shall provide
coverage for continuous glucose monitors under the medical assistance program
for all eligible recipients who have a prescription for such device.
(b) Effective August 1, 2024, eligible recipients shall include all
individuals who meet local coverage determinations, as defined in section
1869(f)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, as such act
existed on January 1, 2024, and shall include individuals with gestational
diabetes.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that no more than six hundred
thousand dollars be appropriated annually from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess
Profit Fund, as described in section 68-996, for the purpose of implementing
subdivision (5)(b) of this section. Any amount in excess of six hundred
thousand dollars shall be funded by the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit
Fund.
(6) On or before October 1, 2023, the department shall seek federal
approval for federal matching funds from the federal Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services through a state plan amendment or waiver to extend postpartum
coverage for beneficiaries from sixty days to at least six months. Nothing in
this subsection shall preclude the department from submitting a state plan
amendment for twelve months.
(7)(a) No later than October 1, 2025, the department shall submit a
medicaid waiver or state plan amendment to the federal Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services to designate two medical respite facilities to reimburse for
services provided to an individual who is:
(i) Homeless; and
(ii) An adult in the expansion population.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Adult in the expansion population means an adult (A) described in 42
U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) as such section existed on January 1, 2024, and
(B) not otherwise eligible for medicaid as a mandatory categorically needy
individual;
(ii) Homeless has the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. 11302 as such
section existed on January 1, 2024;
(iii) Medical respite care means short-term housing with supportive
medical services; and
(iv) Medical respite facility means a residential facility that provides
medical respite care to homeless individuals.
(c) The department shall choose two medical respite facilities, one in a
city of the metropolitan class and one in a city of the primary class, best
able to serve homeless individuals who are adults in the expansion population.
(d) Once such waiver or state plan amendment is approved, the department
shall submit a report to the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature on or before November 30 each year, which provides the (i) number
of homeless individuals served at each facility, (ii) cost of the program, and
(iii) amount of reduction in health care costs due to the program's
implementation.
(e) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
-11-

LB332 LB332
2025 2025
out this subsection.
(f) The services described in subdivision (7)(a) of this section shall be
funded by the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund as described in section
68-996.
(8)(a) No later than January 1, 2025, the department shall provide
coverage for an electric personal-use breast pump for every pregnant woman
covered under the medical assistance program, or child covered under the
medical assistance program if the pregnant woman is not covered, beginning at
thirty-six weeks gestation or the child's date of birth, whichever is earlier.
The electric personal-use breast pump shall be capable of (i) sufficiently
supporting milk supply, (ii) double and single side pumping, and (iii) suction
power ranging from zero mmHg to two hundred fifty mmHg. No later than January
1, 2025, the department shall provide coverage for a minimum of ten lactation
consultation visits for every mother covered under the medical assistance
program or child covered under the medical assistance program, if the mother is
not covered under such program.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriation for
lactation consultation visits shall be equal to an amount that is a one hundred
forty-five percent rate increase over the current lactation consultation rate
paid by the department.
(9)(a) No later than January 1, 2024, the department shall provide
coverage, and reimbursement to providers, for all necessary translation and
interpretation services for eligible recipients utilizing a medical assistance
program service. The department shall take all actions necessary to maximize
federal funding to carry out this subsection.
(b) The services described in subdivision (9)(a) of this section shall be
funded by the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund as described in section
68-996.
(10) No later than January 1, 2026, the department shall provide coverage
for psychology services provided by advanced level practitioners who have
completed advanced training requirements for a doctoral internship in an
accredited training program or a postdoctoral fellowship and who are under
current supervision by a licensed psychologist.
Sec. 37. (1) For purposes of this section, program means the Rural Health
Opportunity Program that encourages students from rural communities to pursue
health care professions and return to practice in those rural communities.
(2)(a) The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges and the Board
of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding to administer the program, including a joint application and
interview process to select students to participate in the program and be
provisionally admitted into one of the eligible health care programs at the
University of Nebraska Medical Center.
(b) To be eligible, students shall:
(i) Attend, or be a graduate of, an approved or accredited high school in
Nebraska or receive an equivalent of a diploma of high school equivalency in
Nebraska; and
(ii) Have lived in, or been a resident of, a rural area of Nebraska as
determined by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges and the
Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska.
(3) A student who participates in the program is entitled to a waiver of
one hundred percent of the cost of tuition and fees per academic year for up to
four years at a state college for the purpose of completing the established
health care program coursework at such state college that is required for early
admission and transfer to an eligible health care program at the University of
Nebraska Medical Center.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to consider continued funding for
the program in an appropriate amount equal to or more than one-half of the cost
of the tuition waivers or fees granted pursuant to this section as part of the
biennial budget process.
Sec. 38. Sections 1, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23,
24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 39, and 41 of this act
become operative three calendar months after the adjournment of this
legislative session. The other sections of this act become operative on their
effective date.
Sec. 39. Original sections 38-511, 38-1501, 38-1502, 38-1504, 38-1505,
38-1508, 38-1510, 38-1511, 38-1514, 38-2849, and 38-2884, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 38-1509, 38-1512, 38-1513, 38-28,104, and
68-911, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 40. Original sections 38-1401, 38-1402, 38-1413, and 38-1424,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 41. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 38-512
and 38-1506, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
Sec. 42. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-12-